Mississippi statutes. Title 77. Public Utilities and Carriers
Certificates of Public Convenience and Necessity; Permits; Interstate Permits

§ 77-7-41.
Certificates of public convenience and necessity required.

No common carrier by motor vehicle not exempted in this chapter shall engage in intrastate operation on any highway within the state unless there is in force with respect to such carrier, a certificate of public convenience and necessity issued by the commission authorizing such operation. Any certificates of public convenience and necessity issued by the commission prior to March 8, 2018, are hereby ratified and adopted as valid and enforceable just as if they had been issued after March 8, 2018.

All certificates of public convenience and necessity issued under this chapter shall be exempt from ad valorem taxation.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, §§ 7639, 7663; Laws, 1938, ch. 142; Laws, 1995, ch. 338, § 4, eff from and after passage (approved March 10, 1995); Laws, 2018, ch. 332, § 4, eff from and after passage (approved March 8, 2018).

§ 77-7-43.
Application for certificate.

Applications for a certificate shall be made in writing, shall be verified under oath, shall be in the form and shall contain the information as the commission may require.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7640; Laws, 1938, ch. 142; Laws, 1993, ch 561, § 4, eff from and after October 1, 1993.

§ 77-7-45.
Hearing on application for certificate; disposition.

Upon the filing of an application for a certificate of public convenience and necessity the commission shall notify the applicant and other parties known to have a substantial interest in the application of the time and place for a public hearing, not less than twenty (20) days prior thereto, and shall hear and determine the application within a reasonable length of time. In determining whether the certificate shall be granted, the commission shall, among other things, give due consideration to the present transportation facilities over the proposed route of the applicant, the volume of traffic over the route, the financial condition of the applicant, and the condition of the highway over the proposed route, or routes.

If the commission shall find the proposed operation justified, and that the applicant is fit, willing and able to perform properly the services proposed and to conform to the provisions of this chapter and the requirements, rules and regulations of the commission, it shall issue a certificate to the applicant, subject to terms, limitations and restrictions as the commission may deem proper, authorizing in whole or in part the operations covered by the application. If the commission shall find the proposed operation not justified, the application shall be denied.

Notwithstanding any provision of this section to the contrary, the certificate as applied for may be granted without a hearing in uncontested cases; however, the commission may hear any uncontested case if it determines that the public interest will be served thereby.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, §§ 7641, 7642; Laws, 1938, ch. 142; Laws, 1948, ch. 327, § 13; Laws, 1987, ch. 309, § 1; Laws, 1993, ch 561, § 5, eff from and after October 1, 1993.

§ 77-7-47.
Temporary certificates.

If the commission should decide that an emergency exists at any time, said commission is hereby authorized and empowered to issue a temporary certificate of convenience and necessity or temporary contract carrier permit to fit applicants, and the State Tax Commission is hereby authorized to collect inspection fees and issue temporary identification credentials to any owner or operator to whom a temporary certificate of convenience and necessity or a temporary contract carrier permit has been issued by the Public Service Commission. The State Tax Commission is also hereby authorized to issue to holders of temporary certificates of convenience and necessity or temporary contract carrier permits the necessary road and bridge privilege license tax temporary permits in the same manner as temporary or seasonal permits are now issued under the provisions of Chapter 19 of Title 27, Mississippi Code of 1972. No temporary certificate of convenience and necessity or contract carrier permit shall be issued by the commission for a period of time less than one (1) month or longer than six (6) months. Reissue of such certificate or permit is hereby authorized if, in the opinion of the commission, such is justified.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7641; Laws, 1938, ch. 142; Laws, 1948, ch. 327, § 13; Laws, 1987, ch. 309, § 2, eff from and after July 1, 1987.

§ 77-7-49.
Permits required.

No contract carrier by motor vehicle, not exempted in this chapter, shall engage in intrastate operation on any highway within the state unless there is in force with respect to such carrier a permit issued by the commission, authorizing such operation.

All permits issued under this chapter shall be exempt from ad valorem taxation.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, §§ 7648, 7663; Laws, 1938, ch. 142.

§ 77-7-51.
Application for permit; disposition.

Applications for permits shall be made to the commission in writing, shall be verified under oath, shall be in the form and contain the information as the commission may by regulation require. A permit shall be issued to any qualified applicant therefor authorizing in whole or in part, the operations covered by the application, if it appears from the applications or from any hearing held thereon, that the applicant is fit, willing, and able to perform properly the service of a contract carrier by motor vehicle, and to conform to the provisions of this chapter and the lawful requirements, rules and regulations of the commission thereunder, and that the proposed operation, to the extent authorized by the permit, will be consistent with the public interest and the policy declared in Section 77-7-3; otherwise, the application shall be denied.

The commission shall specify in the permit the business of the contract carrier covered thereby, and the scope thereof, and shall attach to it, at the time of issuance, and from time to time thereafter, reasonable terms, conditions and limitations consistent with the character of the holder as a contract carrier that are necessary to carry out, with respect to the operations of the carrier, the requirements established by the commission under authority of this chapter. However, no terms, conditions or limitations shall restrict the right of the carrier to substitute or add contracts within the scope of the permit, or to add to his, or her or its equipment or facilities, within the scope of permit, as the development of the business and the demands of the public may require.

Notwithstanding any provision of this section to the contrary, the certificate as applied for may be granted without a hearing in uncontested cases; however, the commission may hear any uncontested case if it determines that the public interest will be served thereby.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7649; Laws, 1938, ch. 142; Laws, 1993, ch 561, § 6, eff from and after October 1, 1993.

§ 77-7-53.
Permit, certificate of convenience and necessity, or other authority for interstate carriers; receipts.

It is unlawful for any motor carrier to use any of the public highways of this state for the transportation of persons or property, or both, in interstate commerce, without first having obtained a certificate of convenience and necessity, permit or other authority from the Interstate Commerce Commission and having obtained from the carrier’s single registration state a receipt showing that the registration fees for the State of Mississippi have been paid.

Interstate motor carriers shall be held subject to rules and regulations as the commission may legally prescribe; however, it is not intended to give the commission any right or power to impose upon or exact from any applicant any general revenue tax of any nature.

All interstate receipts issued under this chapter shall be exempt from ad valorem taxation.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, §§ 7663, 7674; Laws, 1938, ch. 142; Laws, 1987, ch. 309, § 3; Laws, 1993, ch 561, § 7, eff from and after October 1, 1993.

§ 77-7-55.
Fees for certificates and permits.

Upon the filing of an application for a certificate of convenience and necessity, the applicant shall deposit with the commission as a fee, the sum of Fifty Dollars ($50.00), and for the transfer, sale, assignment or lease of such certificate, the sum of Fifty Dollars ($50.00), and for the issuance of a duplicate certificate, the sum of Two Dollars ($2.00).

Upon the filing of an application for a permit as a contract carrier, the applicant shall deposit with the commission as a fee for the issuance thereof, the sum of Fifty Dollars ($50.00), and for the issuance of a duplicate permit, the sum of Two Dollars ($2.00).

All of the fees provided for by this section shall be paid by the commission into the State Treasury to be there placed in the special fund designated by the commission. The fees herein provided for respecting applications for certificates, permits and for the approval of sale, transfer, lease or assignment may not be returned to an applicant after the application has been processed.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7676; Laws, 1938, ch. 142; Laws, 1987, ch. 309, § 4; Laws, 1993, ch 561, § 8, eff from and after October 1, 1993; Laws, 2018, ch. 332, § 5, eff from and after passage (approved March 8, 2018).

§ 77-7-57.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 1995, ch. 338, § 21, eff from and after passage (approved March 10, 1995).

[Codes, 1942, § 7650; Laws, 1938, ch. 142]

§ 77-7-59.
Amendment, suspension and revocation of certificates and permits.

Certificates and permits shall be effective from the date specified therein, and shall remain in effect until terminated as herein provided.

Any such certificate or permit may, upon application of the holder thereof, in the discretion of the commission, be amended or revoked, in whole or in part. Any such certificate or permit may, upon complaint or upon the commission’s own initiative, after notice and hearing, be suspended, changed, or revoked, in whole or in part, for wilful failure to comply with any provision of this chapter, or with any lawful order, rule, or regulation of the commission promulgated thereunder, or with any term, condition, or limitation of such certificate or permit. However, no such certificate or permit shall be revoked (except upon application of the holder) unless the holder thereof wilfully fails to comply, within a reasonable time, not more than ninety (90) days, to be fixed by the commission, with a lawful order of the commission, made as provided herein, commanding obedience to the provisions of this chapter, or to the lawful order, rule, or regulation of the commission thereunder, or to the term, condition, or limitation of such certificate or permit, found by the commission to have been violated by such holder.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7651; Laws, 1938, ch. 142.

§ 77-7-61.
Sale or transfer of certificates and permits.

It shall be lawful, under the conditions specified below, for motor carriers to sell, assign, lease or transfer certificates or permits issued to them under the provisions of this chapter.

Whenever a purchase, lease, assignment or transfer is proposed under this section, the carrier or carriers or the person seeking authority therefor shall present an application to the commission in the form that may be prescribed by the commission, and thereupon the commission shall notify the applicant or applicants and other parties known to have a substantial interest in the proceedings of the time and place for a public hearing should the purchase, lease, assignment or transfer be protested or the commission otherwise requires one, not less than twenty (20) days prior thereto. If, after the hearing, the commission finds that the transaction proposed is in good faith, that the proposed assignee, lessee, purchaser or transferee is fit and able properly to perform the transportation services authorized by such certificate or permit and to comply with the rules, regulations and requirements of the commission, and that the transaction is otherwise consistent with the public interest, it may enter an order approving and authorizing sale, lease, assignment or transfer upon terms and conditions as it shall find to be just and reasonable and with modifications as it may prescribe.

It shall be unlawful for any person, except as provided in this section, to accomplish or effectuate, or to participate in the accomplishing and effectuating, the sale, lease, assignment or transfer of a certificate or permit, however the result is attained.

The commission is hereby authorized, upon complaint or upon its own initiative, to investigate and determine whether any person is violating the provisions of the preceding paragraph of this section.

Notwithstanding any provision of this section to the contrary, the certificates as applied for may be granted without a hearing in uncontested cases; however, the commission may hear any uncontested case if it determines that the public interest will be served thereby.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7652; Laws, 1938, ch. 142; Laws, 1987, ch. 309, § 5; Laws, 1993, ch 561, § 9, eff from and after October 1, 1993.